en: Percolators
xx: Percolators
cs: Kávovary
da: Perkolatorer
de: Perkolatoren & Kaffeebrüher
es: Cafeteras con filtro
fr: Percolateurs
it: Caffettiere
ja: パーコレーター
nl: Percolators
no: Perkolatorer
pl: Perkolatory
pt: Cafeteiras por percolação
ru: Кофейники с ситечком
sv: Perkulatorer
tr: Süzgeçli Kahve İbrikleri

en: Vacuum Coffee Makers
xx: Vacuum Coffee Makers
cs: Vakuové kávovary
da: Vakuumkaffemaskiner
de: Vakuumbereiter
es: Cafetera cona (por vacío)
fr: Cafetières à dépression
it: Macchine da caffè a vuoto
ja: サイフォン式コーヒーメーカー
nl: Vacuümkoffiezetapparaten
no: Vakuumkaffemaskin
pl: Próżniowe ekspresy do kawy
pt: Cafeteiras a vácuo
ru: Вакуумные кофеварки
sv: Kaffepumpor
tr: Vakumlu Kahve Makineleri

en: Cooktops
xx: Cooktops
cs: Vařiče
da: Kogeplader
de: Kochfelder
es: Placas de cocina
fr: Tables de cuisson, Plaque de cuisson
it: Piani cottura
ja: コンロ
nl: Kookplaten
no: Platetopper
pl: Płyty grzewcze
pt: Fogões de mesa
ru: Варочные панели
sv: Spishällar
tr: Setüstü Ocaklar

en: Cotton Candy Machines
xx: Cotton Candy Machines
cs: Stroje na cukrovou vatu
da: Candyflossmaskiner
de: Zuckerwattemaschinen
es: Máquinas de algodón dulce
fr: Machines à barbe à papa
it: Macchine zucchero filato
ja: 綿菓子メーカー
nl: Suikerspinmachines
no: Sukkerspinnmaskiner
pl: Maszynki do waty cukrowej
pt: Máquinas de algodão-doce
ru: Машины для изготовления сахарной ваты
sv: Maskiner för spunnet socker
tr: Pamuk Şeker Makineleri

en: Deep Fryers
xx: Deep Fryers
cs: Fritézy
da: Frituregryder
de: Fritteusen
es: Freidoras
fr: Friteuses, Friteuse
it: Friggitrici
ja: フライヤー
nl: Frituurpannen
no: Frityrkokere
pl: Frytownice
pt: Fritadeiras fundas
ru: Фритюрницы
sv: Fritöser
tr: Fritözler

en: Deli Slicers
xx: Deli Slicers
cs: Elektrické kráječe
da: Pålægsmaskine
de: Aufschnittmaschine
es: Cortadoras de fiambres
fr: Trancheuses à viande
it: Affettatrici per alimenti
ja: ハム・チーズスライサー
nl: Vleessnijders
no: Oppskjærsmaskin
pl: Krajalnice do mięs
pt: Fatiadores de frios
ru: Ломтерезки для мяса
sv: Köttskivare
tr: Et Dilimleyiciler

en: Dishwashers
xx: Dishwashers
cs: Myčky nádobí
da: Opvaskemaskiner
de: Geschirrspüler
es: Lavavajillas
fr: Lave-vaisselle
it: Lavastoviglie
ja: 食器洗浄機
nl: Vaatwasmachines
no: Oppvaskmaskiner
pl: Zmywarki
pt: Lava-louças
ru: Посудомоечные машины
sv: Diskmaskiner
tr: Bulaşık Makineleri

en: Electric Griddles & Grills
xx: Electric Griddles & Grills
cs: Elektrické pánve a grily
da: Elektriske stege- og grillplader
de: Elektrogrills & -bratplatten
es: Planchas y parrillas eléctricas
fr: Grils et barbecues électriques
it: Piastre a griglie elettriche
ja: 電気グリドル・電気グリル
nl: Elektrische bakplaten en grills
no: Elektriske stekeplater og griller
pl: Płyty i grille elektryczne
pt: Grelhadores elétricos
ru: Электрические противни и грили
sv: Elektriska bordsgrillar och grillar
tr: Elektrikli Tavalar ve Izgaralar

en: Electric Kettles
xx: Electric Kettles
cs: Rychlovarné konvice
da: Elkedler
de: Wasserkocher
es: Hervidores eléctricos
fr: Bouilloires électriques, Bouilloire
it: Bollitori elettrici
ja: 電気ポット・電気ケトル
nl: Waterkokers
no: Elektriske kjeler
pl: Czajniki elektryczne
pt: Chaleiras elétricas
ru: Электрические чайники
sv: Vattenkokare
tr: Elektrikli Su Isıtıcıları

en: Electric Skillets & Woks
xx: Electric Skillets & Woks
cs: Remosky
da: Elektriske pander og wokke
de: Elektrische Pfannen & Woks
es: Woks y sartenes eléctricas
fr: Sauteuses et woks électriques
it: Padelle e wok elettrici
ja: 電気グリルパン
nl: Elektrische braadpannen en wokken
no: Elektriske stekepanner og woker
pl: Patelnie i woki elektryczne
pt: Panelas quadradas e woks elétricos
ru: Электрические сковородки и воки
sv: Elektriska stekpannor och wokar
tr: Elektrikli Kızartma Tavaları ve Derin Tavalar

en: Fondue Pots & Sets
xx: Fondue Pots & Sets
cs: Sady na fondue
da: Fonduesæt
de: Fonduetöpfe & -Sets
es: Juegos para fondues
fr: Marmites et ensembles à fondue, Appareils à fondue, Appareil à fondue
it: Set e pentole per fonduta
ja: フォンデュ鍋・フォンデュセット
nl: Fonduesets
no: Fonduegryter og -sett
pl: Zestawy do fondue
pt: Conjuntos para fondue
ru: Наборы для фондю
sv: Fondueset
tr: Fondü Kapları ve Setleri

en: Raclette Grills
xx: Raclette Grills
fr: Appareils à raclette, Appareil à raclette

en: Food Cookers & Steamers
xx: Food Cookers & Steamers
cs: Hrnce na vaření a parní hrnce
da: Kogeapparater og dampere
de: Kochtöpfe & Dampfkochtöpfe
es: Ollas de vapor para alimentos
fr: Cuiseurs et cuiseurs vapeur
it: Cuocitori e dispositivi di cottura al vapore per cibi
ja: 炊飯器・蒸し器
nl: Kook- en stoomapparaten
no: Matkokere og -dampere
pl: Parowary i garnki do gotowania na parze
pt: Panelas e panelas de pressão
ru: Устройства для приготовления пищи и пароварки
sv: Matlagningsmaskiner och ångkokare
tr: Yemek Pişirme Ocakları ve Buharlı Pişiriciler

en: Egg Cookers
xx: Egg Cookers
cs: Vařiče na vejce
da: Æggekogere
de: Eierkocher
es: Cocedores de huevos
fr: Cuiseur à œufs
it: Dispositivi cottura uova
ja: エッグクッカー
nl: Eierkokers
no: Eggkokere
pl: Maszynki do jajek
pt: Cozinhadores de ovos
ru: Яйцеварки
sv: Äggkokare
tr: Yumurta Pişiriciler

en: Food Steamers
xx: Food Steamers
cs: Parní hrnce
da: Dampkogere
de: Dampfgarer
es: Ollas de vapor
fr: Cuiseurs-vapeur
it: Pentole cottura al vapore
ja: 蒸し器
nl: Stoomkokers
no: Matdampere
pl: Parowary
pt: Panelas a vapor
ru: Пароварки
sv: Ångkokare
tr: Buharlı Pişiriciler

en: Rice Cookers
xx: Rice Cookers
cs: Hrnce na rýži
da: Riskogere
de: Reiskocher
es: Arroceras
fr: Cuiseurs à riz, Rice-cooker
it: Dispositivi cottura riso
ja: 炊飯器
nl: Rijstkokers
no: Riskokere
pl: Maszynki do ryżu
pt: Panelas para arroz
ru: Рисоварки
sv: Riskokare
tr: Pilav Pişirme Makineleri

en: Slow Cookers
xx: Slow Cookers
cs: Pomalé hrnce
da: Slow cookere
de: Schongarer
es: Ollas de cocción lenta
fr: Mijoteuses
it: Slow cooker
ja: スロークッカー
nl: Slow cookers
no: Kokekjeler
pl: Wolnowary
pt: Panelas para cozimento lento
ru: Медленноварки
sv: Långsamkokare
tr: Yavaş Pişiriciler

en: Thermal Cookers
xx: Thermal Cookers
cs: Termohrnce
da: Termogryder
de: Thermokocher
es: Ollas térmicas
fr: Cuiseurs lents
it: Termocucine
ja: 保温調理鍋
nl: Thermische kookpotten
no: Termokokere
pl: Thermocookery
pt: Panelas térmicas
ru: Вакуумные кастрюли
sv: Koklådor
tr: Termal Pişirme Makineleri

en: Water Ovens
xx: Water Ovens
cs: Temperovače sous-vide
da: SousVide-ovne
de: Öfen zum Vakuumgaren
es: Hornos de agua
fr: Fours à eau
it: Forni sotto vuoto
ja: ウォーターオーブン
nl: Waterovens
no: Vannovner
pl: Piekarniki do sous-vide
pt: Fornos de água
ru: Сувид-печи
sv: Vattenugnar
tr: Buharlı Fırınlar

en: Food Dehydrators
xx: Food Dehydrators
cs: Sušičky potravin
da: Tørreovne til mad
de: Dörrautomaten
es: Deshidratadores de comida
fr: Déshydrateurs alimentaires
it: Essiccatori cibi
ja: 食品乾燥機
nl: Voedseldrogers
no: Mattørkere
pl: Suszarki do żywności
pt: Desidratador de alimentos
ru: Сушки для пищевых продуктов
sv: Torkugnar
tr: Gıda Kurutucular